Illinois, session 104th, SB1891.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University Employees Custodial Accounts Act 5is amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 95/2)  (from Ch. 144, par. 1702)7    Sec. 2. The governing board of any public institution of 8higher education has the power to establish a defined 9contribution plan to make payments to custodial accounts for 10investment in regulated investment company stock to provide 11retirement benefits as described in Section 403(b)(7) of the 12Internal Revenue Code for eligible employees of such 13institutions. Such payments shall be made with funds made 14available by deductions from or reductions in salary or wages 15of eligible employees who authorize in writing deductions or 16reductions for such purpose. Such stock shall be purchased 17only from persons authorized to sell such stock in this State.18    In administering the defined contribution plan, the 19governing board of any public institution of higher education 20shall require that the defined contribution plan recordkeeper 21agree that, in performing services with respect to the defined 22contribution plan, the recordkeeper: (i) will not use 23information received as a result of providing services with   SB1891- 2 -LRB104 11331 LNS 21418 b1respect to the defined contribution plan or the participants 2in the defined contribution plan to solicit the participants 3in the defined contribution plan for the purpose of 4cross-selling nonplan products and services, unless in 5response to a request by a participant in the defined 6contribution plan or a request by the governing board of the 7public institution of higher education or its authorized 8delegate; and (ii) will not promote, recommend, endorse, or 9solicit participants in the defined contribution plan to 10purchase any financial products or services outside of the 11defined contribution plan, except that links to parts of the 12recordkeeper's or the recordkeeper's affiliate's website that 13are generally available to the public, are about commercial 14products, and may be encountered by a participant in the 15regular course of navigating the recordkeeper's or the 16recordkeeper's affiliate's website will not constitute a 17violation of this item (ii). However, a public institution of 18higher education may allow promotion of limited services if 19the public institution of higher education receives no 20compensation from the recordkeeper for promoting or providing 21such services. Such limited services may include educational, 22counseling, debt reduction, student loan repayment or 23forgiveness, or other services intended to enhance retirement 24savings opportunities. Such limited services may not include 25credit cards, life insurance, or banking products, unless a 26request to provide those products is made by the governing   SB1891- 3 -LRB104 11331 LNS 21418 b1board of the public institution of higher education or its 2authorized delegate. 3(Source: P.A. 103-552, eff. 8-11-23.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.